Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-1414
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the Nebraska Right to Shop Act.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 24.
July 19, 2018